New York, session 2025-2026, A10276.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Nassau is hereby authorized to accept from 3 the Merrick Hook & Ladder Co. 1, an application for exemption from real 4 property taxes pursuant to section 464 of the real property tax law with 5 respect to the 2025-2026 assessment rolls for a portion of the 2025-2026 6 school taxes and a portion of the 2026 general taxes for the parcel 7 conveyed to such organization located at 1893 Oakwood Ave, hamlet of 8 Merrick, town of Hempstead, county of Nassau, otherwise known as Nassau 9 county parcel ID section 55 block 127 lot 62. If accepted, the applica- 10 tion shall be reviewed as if it had been received on or before the taxa- 11 ble status date established for such roll. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 13 such exemption if such organization had filed an application for 14 exemption by the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon 15 approval by the Nassau county legislature, may make appropriate 16 correction to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such 17 organization, therefore, shall have paid any tax with respect to the 18 subject rolls, the applicable governing body or tax department may, in 19 its sole discretion, provide for the refund of those taxes paid and 20 cancel those taxes, fines, penalties, liens or interest remaining 21 unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14393-01-6